Illinois, session 104th, HB1722.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Organization Act is 5amended by adding Section 3.3 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 5/3.3 new)7    Sec. 3.3. Updated short description of bill following 8amendment. If the House of Representatives or the Senate 9adopts an amendment to a bill and if that amendment causes the 10short description of the bill that is posted on the General 11Assembly's website to no longer accurately reflect the bill's 12contents, then the chamber that adopted the amendment shall 13revise the bill's short description so that it accurately 14reflects the bill's contents.